California statutes. Water Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39426.

The petition may consist of any number of separate instruments, which shall be duplicates except as to signatures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39427.

The petitioners shall file with the petition a list of the names and addresses of all persons holding title to land within the proposed district as shown by the last equalized assessment roll of each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39428.

The petition shall also be accompanied by a sufficient undertaking, to be approved by the department, in double the amount of the probable cost of forming the district as estimated by the department, conditioned that the sureties shall pay all of the costs in case the formation is not effected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39429.

The department may require the furnishing of any additional undertaking or payment of money it deems necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39430.

The formation petition and accompanying documents shall be presented to and filed with the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39431.

Signatures to the petition may be withdrawn at any time before its publication is commenced by filing a declaration signed and acknowledged by the petitioner with the department stating that it is the intention of the petitioner to withdraw from the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Time and Place of Hearing [39440. - 39440.]

39440.

Upon the presentation and filing of the formation petition and undertaking the department shall forthwith fix a time and place for the hearing of the petition. The place shall be either the office of the department at Sacramento or some place within an affected county. The time shall be not less than 30 nor more than 120 days after the presentation and filing of the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Publication [39460. - 39466.]

39460.

The department shall publish the formation petition and a notice of the time and place of the hearing on the petition in each affected county once a week for three successive weeks before the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39461.

The notice shall not be published until five days after the filing of the petition and undertaking in the office of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39462.

When the petition consists of a number of separate instruments, only one copy need be published, but the names attached to all of the instruments shall appear in the publication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39463.

The notice shall be issued by the department, shall refer to the petition, and shall be directed to the petitioners, all other persons holding title to land, and all other persons interested in or affected by the project. It shall be substantially in the following form:

Before the Department of Water Resources, State of California.

To the persons named as petitioners in the foregoing petition, to all persons holding title or evidence of title to lands included within the water storage district proposed therein; and to all other persons who may be interested in or affected by the project:

You, and each of you, are hereby notified that the foregoing petition was filed with the Department of Water Resources on the ____ day of ____ and will be heard by the Department of Water Resources at ____ on the ____ day of ____ at the hour of __m. of that day, at which time and place the Department of Water Resources will hear and receive evidence in support of said petition or any objections which may be presented thereto, and will hear and determine the right of all parties holding title or evidence of title to lands not included in the water storage district proposed in said petition, but which lands are already irrigated or susceptible of irrigation from the same common source and by the same system of storage and irrigation works as are particularly referred to and described in said petition, to have said lands included in said district.

This notice is given pursuant to the provisions of Division 14 of the Water Code, to which said division particular reference is hereby made.

Dated ____
Department of Water Resources, by
(Title of person signing for the department)

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

39464.

No defect in the form or contents of the published notice, title to it, or petition, nor failure to publish or error in publishing any signature to the petition shall vitiate the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39465.

The department shall give personal notice by registered mail to all holders of title to land whose names and addresses appear on the list filed pursuant to Section 39427.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39466.

The department shall make and keep for public inspection an affidavit giving the date of mailing and the names and addresses of holders of title to land to whom notices were sent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Investigation by Department [39600. - 39605.]

39600.

The department shall determine the practicability, feasibility, and utility of the proposed project, and for that purpose may make all necessary studies, examinations, surveys, plans, and estimates of cost.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39601.

The department, for the purposes of the determination, may employ all necessary assistants, or acquire and use any existing estimates, surveys, and reports.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39602.

The total of all expenses incurred pursuant to this chapter shall not exceed a sum in dollars equal in amount to one-fourth the number of acres in the proposed district and is a part of the expense of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39603.

The department shall issue warrants to pay expenses incurred pursuant to this chapter, which warrants shall be considered and treated as warrants of the district and shall be payable out of the funds of the district when its formation has been completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39604.

Provision may be made for payment of warrants issued pursuant to this article in any bond issue authorized for the purposes of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39605.

If the district is not organized, any warrants issued by the department shall be a charge upon the undertakings provided for in this part and shall thereupon become due and payable by the sureties on the undertakings, and the holders of the warrants shall have a cause of action against the sureties thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Hearing on Formation [39750. - 39800.]



  ARTICLE 1. Preliminary Determination [39750. - 39753.]

39750.

At the hearing the department shall determine and express by order whether or not the petition and notice complies with this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39751.

The department shall hear all competent and relevant testimony offered in support of or in opposition to the sufficiency of the petition and the publication of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39752.

The hearing may be adjourned from time to time, not exceeding 30 days in all.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39753.

If the department determines that any of the requirements of this part were not complied with, the petition shall be dismissed without prejudice to the right of the proper number of persons to present a new petition covering the same matter or to present the same petition with additional signatures if additional signatures are necessary to comply with the requirements of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Hearing on Petition [39775. - 39800.]

39775.

If the department determines that all requirements of Chapter 1 of this part were complied with, the department shall forthwith hear the petition and all evidence offered in its support and in support of the written objections, and the written application of any holder of title to land included in the proposed district to have that land excluded therefrom, and the written application of any holder of title to other land already irrigated or susceptible of irrigation from the source and by the same works referred to in the petition, to have that land included in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39776.

At the conclusion of the final hearing on the petition the department shall make an order containing all of the following:

(a) Reaffirmance when it is consistent with its conclusions of the genuineness and sufficiency of the petition and the regularity and sufficiency of the notice of the hearing.

(b) Determination of the practicability, feasibility, and utility of the proposed project.

(c) Establishment of the boundaries of or a description of the land in the proposed district.

(d) Specification of the proposed source or sources of a water supply.

(e) Specification of the proposed place, if any, for storage of water for irrigation purposes.

(f) Estimation of cost of the proposed project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39777.

The order on final hearing shall also divide the proposed district into five, seven, nine, or eleven divisions so as to segregate into separate divisions lands possessing the same general character of water rights or interests in the water of a common source. The divisions shall be numbered first, second, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh, eighth, ninth, tenth, or eleventh, according to the number of the division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39778.

The order shall be entered in full upon the records of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39779.

A copy of the order certified by the department together with a map showing the exterior boundaries of the district and indicating the land, if any, excluded therefrom shall forthwith be filed for record in the office of the county recorder of each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39800.

A finding of the department in favor of the genuineness and sufficiency of the petition and the regularity and sufficiency of the notice shall be conclusive against all persons except the State upon suit by the Attorney General commenced within 90 days after the date of first filing in the office of any county recorder of a certified copy of the order as required by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Election on Formation [39900. - 39933.]



  ARTICLE 1. Calling of Election [39900. - 39903.]

39900.

Upon filing the order on final hearing of the formation petition, the department shall within 60 days give notice of an election to be held in the proposed district for the purpose of determining whether or not it shall be formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39901.

The notice of the formation election shall contain:

(a) A description of the boundaries of the proposed district or the land included.

(b) A description of each division.

(c) The name of the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39902.

The notice of the formation election shall be published once a week for at least three weeks prior to the election in each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39903.

In the order calling the election, the department shall designate voting places and appoint three holders of title to land to act as a board of election at each voting place.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Conduct of Election [39925. - 39933.]

39925.

Not less than 10 days before the formation election, any 10 or more voters in any division of the proposed district may file with the department a petition requesting that the name of a specified person be placed on the ballot for the particular division as a candidate for the office of director to represent the particular division. Only the names proposed by the petitions filed with the department shall be printed on the ballots for the various divisions of the district. The date of actual receipt of any such petition by the department shall be deemed to be the date of filing of the same with the department. If there are less than 10 voters in any division, signatures of one-third of the number of voters, rounded up to the next whole number, shall be required to nominate a candidate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1593, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

39926.

For the purposes of the formation election the department shall establish and define the boundaries of one or more election precincts for each division in the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39927.

The formation election shall be conducted as nearly as practicable in accordance with the provisions of this division concerning general elections, but no particular form of ballot shall be required.

The qualifications of voters at a formation election shall be the same as the qualifications of voters for general elections provided for in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39928.

At the formation election there shall be elected a board of directors corresponding in number to the number of divisions in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39929.

No director shall be elected by the district at large, but one director shall be elected by each division to represent that division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39930.

The directors shall qualify in the same manner as directors elected at a general election, as provided in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39931.

On the ballots provided for the formation election shall be printed:

(a) To the right of or below the question on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” on separate lines, with voting targets.

(b) The names of persons to be voted for at the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 54.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

39932.

The department shall on the second Monday following the formation election canvass the votes cast thereat and if upon the canvass it appears that a majority of all the votes cast at the formation election are “Water storage district—Yes” the department shall canvass the votes for directors and declare the persons receiving the highest number of votes in each division to be elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39933.

If upon the canvass it appears that a majority of all the votes cast are “Water storage district—No,” the result shall be declared and recorded in the records kept by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Establishment of District [40100. - 40104.]

40100.

If a majority of all the votes cast at the formation election are “Water storage district—Yes,” the department shall by an order entered in the records kept by it, declare the territory formed as a district under the name designated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

40101.

The department shall immediately file for record in the office of the county recorder of each affected county a certified copy of the order declaring the district formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

40102.

From the filing for record of the order declaring the district formed the formation of the district is complete.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

40103.

At the time the department declares the district formed it shall issue certificates of election to each person elected a director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

40104.

The department shall immediately file with the Secretary of State a certificate listing:

(a) The name of the district.

(b) The date of formation.

(c) The county or counties in which the district is located, and a description of the boundaries of the district, or reference to a map showing such boundaries, which map shall be attached to the certificate, or reference to the county recorder’s office where a description of such boundaries has been recorded.

If the order declaring the district formed contains all of the information required to be in the certificate, the department may file a copy of the order in lieu of the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. INTERNAL ORGANIZATION [40300. - 40800.]



  CHAPTER 1. Officers [40300. - 40383.]



  ARTICLE 1. Qualification and Tenure [40300. - 40307.]

40300.

Directors, irrespective of the method of their selection, take office as soon as they qualify, except that directors elected at a general election take office at the commencement of the regular meeting of the board following their election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

40301.

Within 10 days after receiving his certificate of election or being appointed, each director shall take and subscribe the official oath, and file it in the office of the district and execute the bond required of him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

40302.

The members of the board elected at the formation election shall at their first meeting classify themselves by lot into two classes as nearly equal in number as possible. The term of office of the class having the greater number shall expire at the commencement of the regular meeting of the board in April following the next general March election; and the term of office of the class having the lesser number shall expire at the commencement of the regular meeting of the board in April following the next general March election thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

40303.

After such classification the board shall elect a president from their number and appoint a secretary and treasurer, each of whom shall hold office during the pleasure of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

40304.

On the day of the regular meeting of the board in April next following each general election, the directors shall meet and organize as a board, elect a president and appoint a secretary and a treasurer, who shall each hold office during the pleasure of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

40305.

The board may elect a vice president and appoint an assistant secretary to serve during the pleasure of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

40306.

The term of office of each director elected after the formation election shall be four years, and until his or her successor is elected and has qualified. Upon the district receiving actual written notice that a director or the entity the director represents no longer is a holder of title within the district or that the holder of title the director represents is withdrawing the director’s authorization, a vacancy shall be deemed to occur, but the director shall continue to serve until his or her successor is elected or appointed and qualified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1593, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

40307.

In order to be nominated and eligible for the office of director, a candidate shall be a holder of title within the district. If a holder of title to land is not a natural person, the holder of title to land may designate a representative or representatives to be eligible to be elected or appointed as a director by filing with the district written evidence of that designation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1593, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Official Bonds [40330. - 40336.]

40330.

The amount of the bond to be given by the secretary for the faithful performance of his duties shall be fixed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

40331.

The treasurer of the district shall execute a bond in an amount to be fixed by the board, the minimum amount thereof not to be less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

40332.

Each member of the board shall execute a bond in the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

40333.

The bonds of the first directors of any district may be approved by a judge of the superior court of any affected county and recorded in the office of the recorder of such county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

40334.

The bonds of the directors, other than the first directors, shall be approved by a judge of the superior court, recorded in the office of the recorder of the office county, and filed with the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

40335.

All bonds shall be made payable to the district and be in the form prescribed for the official bonds of county officers. Premiums may be paid by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

40336.

If any district is appointed fiscal agent of or by the United States in connection with any federal reclamation project, the directors and the treasurer shall each execute an additional bond in the sum required by the Secretary of the Interior, conditioned for the faithful discharge of his duties and the faithful discharge of the district of its duties under the appointment. These bonds may be sued upon by the United States or any person injured by the failure of these officers promptly and completely to perform their respective duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Compensation [40355. - 40356.]

40355.

(a) A director, when sitting on the board or acting under its orders, shall receive not exceeding:

(1) One hundred dollars ($100) per day, not exceeding six days in any calendar month.

(2) Actual and necessary expenses while engaged in official business under the order of the board.

(b) For purposes of this section, the determination of whether a director’s activities on any specific day are compensable shall be made pursuant to Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(c) Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 90.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

40356.

The board shall fix the compensation to be paid to all other officers and employees provided for in this division, to be paid out of the treasury of the district, except as otherwise provided by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Misconduct [40383. - 40383.]

40383.

For wilful violation of any express duty provided for in this division on the part of any officer named in this division, he shall be liable upon his official bond and subject to removal from office by proceeding brought in the superior court of the office county by any assessment payer of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Appointments to Fill Vacancies [40500. - 40500.]

40500.

A vacancy in the office of director shall be filled pursuant to Section 1780 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1059.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Board Meetings and Duties [40650. - 40659.]

40650.

The directors elected at the formation election shall on the first Tuesday after their election and qualification meet and organize as a board and designate an office of the board, which shall also be the office of the district, at which the board shall thereafter hold its meetings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

40651.

The board shall hold a regular meeting each month at the place selected as the district office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

40652.

The board may by resolution duly entered upon its minutes fix any other time or place for the regular monthly meeting, but no such change shall become effective until after the resolution making it has been published once a week for two successive weeks in the office county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

40653.

Special meetings of the board may be held as required for the proper transaction of the business of the district, but shall be ordered by a majority of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

40654.

The order calling a special meeting shall be entered of record and specify the business to be transacted. Five days’ notice of the order must be given to each director not joining in the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

40655.

No other business than that specified in the order may be transacted at a special meeting unless all the members are present and consent to the consideration of any business not specified in the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

40656.

All meetings of the board shall be public and a majority shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. A smaller number of directors than a quorum may adjourn from day to day.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

40657.

All records of the board shall be open to public inspection during business hours.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

40657.5.

A district may destroy a record pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60200) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

40658.

The board shall manage and conduct the business of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

40659.

The board of a district in existence on the effective date of this section shall file a certificate with the Secretary of State on or before January 1, 1964, listing:

(a) The name of the district.

(b) The date of formation.

(c) The county or counties in which the district is located, and a description of the boundaries of the district, or reference to a map showing such boundaries, which map shall be attached to the certificate, or reference to the county recorder’s office where a description of such boundaries has been recorded.

If the order declaring the district formed contains all of the information required to be in the certificate, the board may file a copy of the order in lieu of the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Change of Office [40800. - 40800.]

40800.

The office of the board and its place of meetings may be changed by a majority vote of the board, but no such change shall become effective until after the resolution making it has been published once a week for two successive weeks in the county in which the office of the board has theretofore been located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. ELECTIONS [41000. - 41905.]



  CHAPTER 1. Voters and Qualifications [41000. - 41020.]

41000.

Only the holders of title to land are entitled to vote at a general election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41001.

Each voter may vote in each precinct in which any of the land owned by him is situated and may cast one vote for each one hundred dollars ($100), or fraction thereof, worth of his land, exclusive of improvements, minerals, and mineral rights therein, in the precinct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41002.

Each male or female voter over the age of 18 years may vote in person or by proxy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1748.)
-------------------------------------------

41003.

Any guardian, conservator, administrator, or executor, of a person or estate owning land within the district shall be considered the holder of title to land for the purposes of this division, where the owner in fee is not entitled to vote.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

41004.

Any corporation holding title to land within the district is entitled to vote through any officer or agent authorized in writing under the seal of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41005.

No person shall vote by proxy unless his authority to cast such vote is evidenced by an instrument acknowledged and filed with the board of election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41006.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other section of this division, if a holder of title to land enters into a contract for the sale of the land on deferred installments of the purchase price, the purchaser named in the contract is entitled to cast one-half of the vote allotted to such land at any district election if all the following have occurred:

(a) The land is separately assessed on the county assessment roll.

(b) A copy of the contract of sale is filed with the secretary at least 30 days prior to the date of the election.

(c) The purchaser is not delinquent for more than six months in the payment of any sums required to be paid under the contract.

For the purposes of this section, the county assessor shall, at the request of any purchaser, separately assess and separately list all such lands upon the assessment roll.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41007.

At least 20 days prior to any district election, the secretary shall prepare a list for each precinct showing:

(a) The names of the holders of title to land who enter into contracts of sale, as shown by the copies of the contracts on file in his office.

(b) The name of the purchaser.

(c) A description of the land subject to each contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41008.

Each precinct list shall be delivered to the election board for the precinct prior to the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41009.

At least five days prior to each election, the secretary shall notify in writing each holder of title to land named as the seller in any contract on file in his office that the contract has been filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41010.

Any person entitled to vote at a district election may challenge the right of a purchaser to vote in accordance with the provisions of Section 41006. Challenges shall be made and determined as nearly as practicable in the manner provided by the Elections Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41011.

Where property has been conveyed prior to the election and the change of interest does not appear by the assessment roll, the original deed of conveyance or a copy thereof certified by the county recorder, or otherwise authenticated, shall be sufficient evidence to entitle the holder thereof to vote the acreage therein described.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41012.

Any person not legally qualified to vote who makes any false statement in respect to his right to vote shall incur all of the penalties provided in the Elections Code for persons illegally voting at elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41013.

The department prior to the formation election, and at all subsequent elections the board, shall prepare, certify, and furnish to the election board at each voting place in the district a copy of each of the assessment rolls pertaining to any land in the precinct or, if applicable, the election roll prepared in accordance with Section 41027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1593, Sec. 5.   Effective September 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

41014.

The department or the board shall likewise prepare and furnish to the election boards lists certified by the register of the United States Land Office or the State Lands Commission, as the case may be, showing the land entered under the laws of the United States or of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41015.

The lists shall contain the names of the persons entitled to possessory rights and the quantity of land held by each.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41016.

The most recent county assessment rolls and lists, or, if applicable, the election roll prepared in accordance with Section 41027, shall be used by the election boards in determining the qualifications of voters and the number of votes each voter is entitled to cast.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1593, Sec. 6.   Effective September 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

41017.

Where a tract of land is situated partly within and partly without the boundaries of a precinct and the assessment roll contains a valuation of the tract as a whole, the tract must be apportioned according to the number of acres lying within and without the boundaries of the precinct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41018.

If there is included in any assessment roll or list furnished to an election board any land which has no valuation assigned to it, the department or the board, as the case may be, shall request the county assessor to value the land and the county assessor shall prepare and furnish to the department or board requesting it a statement of the value of the land as appraised by him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41019.

The value shall be arrived at as nearly as may be done in the same manner and upon the same basis as was the valuation for purposes of taxation assessed upon other lands in the precinct similarly situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41020.

The valuation made by the county assessor shall be furnished to the election board of the precinct in which the land is situated and shall be used by the election board in determining the number of votes which the holder of title to the land is entitled to cast.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Alternative Election Roll [41025. - 41028.]

41025.

As an alternative to using the most recent county assessment roll, the board may cause an election roll to be prepared and used for determining ownership and value of parcels for all purposes involving elections. For purposes of a formation election, the department may also elect to cause an election roll to be prepared and shall perform those functions designated to be performed by the board or secretary in this chapter. If the procedures provided in this chapter are used, Sections 41018 to 41020, inclusive, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1593, Sec. 7.   Effective September 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

41026.

(a) The board shall have a preliminary election roll prepared pursuant to subdivision (b) by a registered civil engineer. The engineer shall prepare the preliminary election roll by division unless all district elections are at large.

(b) The preliminary election roll shall include each parcel of land listed on the most recent county assessment roll, any federal and state land, and any other unvalued lands within the district. For each parcel, the preliminary election roll shall list the name of the holder of title to land and the area of that parcel. The preliminary election roll shall assign each voter one of the following:

(1) One vote for each acre of land owned by that voter within the district. If the voter owns less than one acre, the voter shall be entitled to one vote. Any fraction of an acre shall be rounded to the next full acre.

(2) A number of votes based on the benefits derived by each parcel from being within the boundaries of the district, or from receiving services from the district, or both. The engineer shall consider, among other factors, the nature of the use or allowed uses of the parcel, whether the parcel is developed or undeveloped, and the nature of the district’s services provided to or available to the parcel.
